Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2349.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3733(a) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 3733. Deposits into account.(a) General rule.--* * *(3) Beginning on the effective date of this paragraph, fines, fees or costs which are allocated by law or otherwise directed to the Department of Agriculture under the act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law, shall not be affected by this subchapter.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617